Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.44.210

Final notice after two years—Sale.

After the expiration of two years from the time of mailing the notice, the director shall mail in a securely closed postpaid registered letter, addressed to the person at his or her last known address, a final notice stating that two years have elapsed since the sending of the notice referred to in RCW 30A.44.200, and that the director will sell all the property or articles of value set out in the notice, at a specified time and place, not less than thirty days after the time of mailing the final notice. Unless the person shall, on or before the day mentioned, claim the property, identify himself or herself and offer evidence of his or her right thereto, to the satisfaction of the director, the director may sell all the property or articles of value listed in the notice, at public auction, at the time and place stated in the final notice: PROVIDED, That a notice of the time and place of sale has been published once within ten days prior to the sale in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the sale is held. Any such property held by the director, the owner of which is not known, may be sold at public auction after it has been held by the director for two years, provided, that a notice of the time and place of sale has been published once within ten days prior to the sale in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the sale is held.

[ 2014 c 37 s 237; 1994 c 92 s 125; 1985 c 469 s 15; 1955 c 33 s 30.44.210. Prior: 1947 c 148 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3281-4. Formerly RCW 30.44.210.]